Hawaii, session 2026, SB958.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that failing cesspools are contaminating the State's groundwater, streams, and coastal ecosystems.  To address this, the legislature has required all cesspools to be upgraded or converted to a wastewater system approved by the director of health or connected to a sewerage system by 2050. The legislature has recognized that the requirement to upgrade or convert a cesspool imposes a financial burden on low‑ and moderate-income families.  In Act 153, Session Laws of Hawaii 2022 (Act 153), the legislature established in the department of health the cesspool compliance pilot grant project to assist with conversion costs for low- and moderate-income property owners, including lessees on Hawaiian home lands, located in an area identified as priority level 1 or 2 by the Hawaii cesspool prioritization tool.  However, the appropriation under Act 153 lapsed as of June 30, 2024. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to appropriate funds for the cesspool compliance pilot grant project. SECTION 2.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $5,000,000 or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 to fund the cesspool compliance pilot grant project, including the establishment of three full-time equivalent (3.0 FTE) positions; provided that the appropriation may be used to contract for services to administer the program. The sums appropriated shall be expended by the department of health for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 3.  This Act shall take effect on December 31, 2050.